Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1287
Fees; disposition.

(1) The county treasurers or the Department of Motor Vehicles shall charge a fee of six dollars for each certificate of title and a fee of three dollars for each notation of any lien on a certificate of title. The county treasurers shall retain for the county four dollars of the six dollars charged for each certificate of title and two dollars for each notation of lien. The remaining amount of the fee charged for the certificate of title and notation of lien under this subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

(2) The county treasurers or the department shall charge a fee of ten dollars for each replacement or duplicate copy of a certificate of title, and the duplicate copy issued shall show only those unreleased liens of record. Such fees shall be remitted by the county or the department to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

(3) In addition to the fees prescribed in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the county treasurers or the department shall charge a fee of four dollars for each certificate of title, each replacement or duplicate copy of a certificate of title, and each notation of lien on a certificate of title. The county treasurers or the department shall remit the fee charged under this subsection to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(4) The county treasurers shall remit fees due the State Treasurer under this section monthly and not later than the twentieth day of the month following collection. The county treasurers shall credit fees not due to the State Treasurer to their respective county general fund.

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 15;

Laws 1995, LB 467, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 23;

Laws 2009, LB202, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB135, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 23;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 6.